Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 56 Duty to Render Assistance

11-56-1.
Duty to assist.

Any person at the scene of an emergency who knows that another person is exposed to, or has suffered, grave physical harm shall, to the extent that he or she can do so without danger or peril to himself or herself or to others, give reasonable assistance to the exposed person. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a petty misdemeanor and shall be subject to imprisonment for a term not exceeding six (6) months, or by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 416, § 1.